exercise3/en_fi_subjects_guesser.xfst
clear stack

define Vowel  a | e | i | o | u | y ;
define Cons   b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | r | s | t | v | w | x | z ;
define EngWord (Cons | Vowel ) + ;

define yToia         y -> i a || _ .#. ;
define IcsToIikka    i c s -> i i k k a || _ .#. ;
define IcToIikki     i c -> i i k k i || _ .#. ;

define ChToK         c h -> k ;
define PhToF         p h -> f ;
define ThToT         t h -> t ;
 
regex EngWord .o. ChToK .o. PhToF .o. ThToT .o. yToia .o. IcsToIikka .o. IcToIikki ;
